Wisconsin, session 2025, AB900.
do enact as follows:AB900,14Section 1. 71.613 (3) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB900,2,3571.613 (3) (am) No credit may be allowed under this section for any part of a 1claimant’s qualifying acres on which a photovoltaic solar energy system, as defined 2in s. 13.48 (2) (h) 1. d., that is not an accessory use, as defined in s. 91.01 (1), is 3located during any part of the taxable year.AB900,24Section 2. 71.613 (3) (d) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 71.613 (3) (d) 1s.AB900,35Section 3. 71.613 (3) (d) 1e. of the statutes is created to read:AB900,2,6671.613 (3) (d) 1e. The number of the claimant’s qualifying acres.AB900,47Section 4. 71.613 (3) (d) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:AB900,2,10871.613 (3) (d) 1m. The number of qualifying acres on which a photovoltaic 9solar energy system, as defined in s. 13.48 (2) (h) 1. d., that is not an accessory use, 10as defined in s. 91.01 (1), is located during any part of the taxable year.AB900,511Section 5. Initial applicability.AB900,2,1212(1) This act first applies to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.AB900,2,1313